Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB156.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1017. Carbon Monoxide Alarm Standards in Children's Institutions and Family Child Care Homes.--(a) Within eighteen months of the effective date of this subsection, each building in which a children's institution or family child care home is <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 in operation, which uses a fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance, fireplace or attached garage, must have an operational, centrally located and approved carbon monoxide alarm that is installed:(1) within fifteen feet of any fossil-fuel-burning heater or appliance, fireplace or attached garage; and(2) on every level of a children's institution or family child care home.(b) The department may take enforcement action against a children's institution or family child care home for a violation of subsection (a) in accordance with Article IX, this article and applicable regulations.(c) Within twelve months of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall provide written notice of the requirements under this section to each children's institution or family child care home.(d) Nothing in this section is intended to modify the authority and responsibilities of the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the "Pennsylvania Construction Code Act."(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved carbon monoxide alarm" means as defined in section 2 of the act of December 18, 2013 (P.L.1229, No.121), known as the "Carbon Monoxide Alarm Standards Act.""Children's institution" means a children's institution as defined in section 901 that provides child care."Installed" means a carbon monoxide alarm that is hardwired into the electrical wiring, directly plugged into an electrical 20250HB0156PN1302 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 outlet without a switch, other than a circuit breaker, or, if the alarm is battery-powered, attached to the wall or ceiling of a unit of a children's institution or family child care home, in accordance with the National Fire Alarm and Signaling Code (NFPA 72)."Operational" means working and in service."Unit" means a room or suite of two or more rooms that is:(1) occupied as a residence;(2) intended or designed to be occupied as a residence; or(3) is occupied by a client of a children's institution or family child care home.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.SECTION 1. THE ACT OF JUNE 13, 1967 (P.L.31, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE HUMAN SERVICES CODE, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1017. CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM STANDARDS IN CHILD CARE CENTERS AND FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES.--(A) WITHIN EIGHTEEN MONTHS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH BUILDING IN WHICH A CHILD CARE CENTER OR FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME IS IN OPERATION, WHICH USES A FOSSIL-FUEL-BURNING HEATER OR APPLIANCE, FIREPLACE OR ATTACHED GARAGE, MUST HAVE AN OPERATIONAL, CENTRALLY LOCATED AND APPROVED CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM THAT IS INSTALLED:(1) WITHIN FIFTEEN FEET OF ANY FOSSIL-FUEL-BURNING HEATER OR APPLIANCE, FIREPLACE OR ATTACHED GARAGE; AND(2) ON EVERY LEVEL OF A CHILD CARE CENTER OR FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY TAKE ENFORCEMENT ACTION AGAINST A CHILD CARE CENTER OR FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME FOR A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE IX, THIS ARTICLE AND 20250HB0156PN1302 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 APPLICABLE REGULATIONS.(C) WITHIN TWELVE MONTHS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION TO EACH CHILD CARE CENTER OR FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION IS INTENDED TO MODIFY THE AUTHORITY AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 10, 1999 (P.L.491, NO.45), KNOWN AS THE "PENNSYLVANIA CONSTRUCTION CODE ACT."(E) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"APPROVED CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM" MEANS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 18, 2013 (P.L.1229, NO.121), KNOWN AS THE "CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM STANDARDS ACT.""CHILD CARE CENTER" MEANS THE FOLLOWING:(1) A "CHILDREN'S INSTITUTION" THAT PROVIDES "CHILD CARE" AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED UNDER SECTION 901.(2) A "CHILD CARE CENTER" AS DEFINED UNDER SECTION 1001."INSTALLED" MEANS A CARBON MONOXIDE ALARM THAT IS HARDWIRED INTO THE ELECTRICAL WIRING, DIRECTLY PLUGGED INTO AN ELECTRICAL OUTLET WITHOUT A SWITCH, OTHER THAN A CIRCUIT BREAKER, OR, IF THE ALARM IS BATTERY-POWERED, ATTACHED TO THE WALL OR CEILING OF A UNIT OF A CHILD CARE CENTER OR FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE NATIONAL FIRE ALARM AND SIGNALING CODE (NFPA 72)."OPERATIONAL" MEANS WORKING AND IN SERVICE.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 90 DAYS.20250HB0156PN1302 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728